Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1258.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2306(c)(1)(i) of Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2306. Capital development loans.* * *(c) Authority review.--(1) Within 30 days of receiving a recommendation and a completed application, the authority shall review the application. If the authority is satisfied that all requirements have been met, the authority may approve the loan request in accordance with the following:(i) A loan for land, buildings and machinery and equipment may not exceed [$400,000] $2,000,000 or 50% of the total capital development project costs, whichever is 123456789101112131415161718 less. For the purposes of this subparagraph, capital development project costs incurred during the 12-month period prior to the date of submission of the application to the authority shall be considered part of the total capital development project costs.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1258PN1560 - 2 - 1234567